Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-503
Commission, defined.

Commission means the Nebraska Information Technology Commission.

Laws 1998, LB 924, § 4;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1504;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 273.